California, session 20252026, AB1380.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 4960) is added to Part 4 of Division 4 of the Public Resources Code, to read: CHAPTER 2. Formerly Incarcerated Firefighter Certification and Employment Program4960. (a) (1) Within six months from the date this chapter becomes operative, as described in subdivision (g), the department shall, in partnership with the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation and the California Conservation Camp program, implement a standardized process to ensure that all individuals who successfully complete the department’s firefighting training program (FFT program) while incarcerated receive official written certification before their release from prison. That certification shall be considered adequate for employment at the department in the classification of Fire Fighter 1.(2) The official written certification pursuant to paragraph (1) shall include, but is not limited to, the following certifications: (A)L­180 Human Factors in the Wildland Fire Service.(B)S­130 Wildland Fire Safety Training.(C)S­190 Introduction to Wildland Fire Behavior.(D)Public Safety First Aid.(E)Fire Protection Orientation.(F)Confined Space Rescue Awareness.(G)Fire Fighter 1B: HazMat Certificate.(A) CAL-FIRE Forestry Training.(B) S-190 Introduction to Wildland Fire Behavior.(b) On or before January 1, 2027, the department shall ensure a minimum percentage of Fire Fighter Classification 1 positions are reserved for the hiring of qualified formerly incarcerated individuals as follows: award hiring preference under Category Placement 2 to qualified formerly incarcerated individuals who apply for positions with the department.(c) Nothing in this section shall preclude the department from placing a formerly incarcerated person in a higher category for hiring based on their level of training, certification, employment history, or other factors.(1)Subject to the receipt of a sufficient quantity of job applications from qualified formerly incarcerated individuals, the department shall reserve at least fifteen percent of all vacant Fire Fighter 1 classification positions each year for the hiring of qualified formerly incarcerated individuals.(2)If in any year the department does not receive enough applications from qualified formerly incarcerated individuals to meet the percentage threshold pursuant to paragraph (1), the department shall nevertheless remain in compliance with this subdivision if the following conditions are meet:(A)The department took meaningful steps to recruit qualified formerly incarcerated individuals to comply with paragraph (1).(B)The department hired all qualified formerly incarcerated individuals who submitted an application that year.(c)(d) The department shall, in partnership with the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, annually track the number of incarcerated individuals who have completed the FFT program and are set to be released from prison within the next 90 days to ensure a sufficient number of vacant Fire Fighter 1 classification positions are a available for hiring purposes. 90 days.(d)(e) Nothing in this section shall preclude other state agencies with wildland management responsibilities from establishing similar pathways to support wildfire prevention, mitigation, and response efforts with priority hiring reserved for formerly incarcerated individuals who completed the FFT program.(e)(f) The department shall develop and implement policies and procedures to track and report the outcomes of this chapter, including, but not limited to, the number of participants hired, retention rates, and career advancement opportunities.(f)(g) (1) For three years from the date this chapter becomes operative, as described in subdivision (g), (h), the department shall submit an annual report to the Legislature on the implementation and effectiveness of this chapter, including recommendations for improvement. (2) A report submitted to the Legislature pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code. (g)(h) This chapter shall become operative only upon an appropriation by the Legislature for its purposes in the annual Budget Act or any other statute.(h)(i) For the purposes of this section, “qualified formerly incarcerated individual” means any formerly incarcerated individual who completed the FFT program and has a valid certification pursuant to subdivision (a).